Illinois, session 104th, HB5752.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the University of Illinois for the expansion 7of biomanufacturing and alternative protein research and 8development at the University's integrated bioprocessing 9research laboratory. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.